Louisiana, session 2026, SB490.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 45:1231.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1231.1. Private use electrical networks
A. For purposes of this Section the following terms shall have the
following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Private use electrical network" means generation, energy storage,
and related electrical facilities that:
(a) Are located on contiguous, adjacent, or commonly controlled
property.
(b) Are primarily dedicated to serving the electricity requirements of one
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1513 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 490
or more identified load customers.
(c) Deliver electricity through privately owned electrical facilities.
(2) "Identified load customer" means an industrial facility,
manufacturing operation, data center, digital infrastructure campus, or similar
large-load customer.
(3) "Primarily dedicated" means that, measured on a rolling twelve-
month basis, and notwithstanding deviations resulting from scheduled
maintenance, force majeure, customer commissioning, or customer ramp-up,
at least fifty percent of either the annual net electrical energy output of the
private use electrical network, or the contract nameplate capacity of the
network, is committed to serving one or more identified load customers under
a written agreement with an initial term of five years or greater.
B. For purposes of this Section, retail sale of electricity shall not include
the delivery or sale of electricity from a private use electrical network, or its
owner or operator, to an identified load customer that is served by that
network, regardless of the form of the commercial arrangement, including
without limitation a power purchase agreement, energy services agreement,
lease, tolling agreement, or affiliate transaction.
C. A private use electrical network shall not be deemed a public utility.
The owner or operator thereof shall not be subject to regulation by the
Louisiana Public Service Commission as a public utility and shall not be subject
to any exclusive retail franchise, certificated service territory, or retail service
right of any electric public utility, electric cooperative, or municipal electric
provider, solely because the network satisfies one or more of the following:
(1) Serves one or more identified load customers.
(2) Is owned or operated by the load customer, an affiliate of the load
customer, or an unaffiliated third party pursuant to contract.
(3) Maintains an interconnection with an electric utility for backup
service, reliability service, emergency service, maintenance service, or export
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1513 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 490
of surplus electricity.
(4) Participates in any wholesale market, ancillary service, capacity
market, emergency service, or reliability program administered by the
Midcontinent Independent System Operator or any successor regional
transmission organization.
D. Participation by a private use electrical network in any wholesale
market, ancillary service, capacity market, emergency service, or reliability
program administered by the Midcontinent Independent System Operator or
any successor regional transmission organization shall not cause the network,
its output, or any portion thereof to be characterized as a public utility service
or retail sale.
E. The maintenance of backup utility service, standby service, or export
capability shall not alter the status of a private use electrical network under this
Section.
F. The export of electricity from a private use electrical network shall
not cause such network to be deemed a public utility, provided that the network
is primarily dedicated to serving one or more identified load customers.
G. Nothing in this Section shall impair the authority of the Louisiana
Public Service Commission to regulate the rates, terms, and conditions of
backup, standby, or export service provided by an electric utility.
H. Upon receipt of a complete interconnection application from a private
use electrical network for backup, standby, reliability, or export service, the
interconnecting electric utility shall complete all required interconnection
studies and execute an interconnection agreement within one hundred eighty
days. Failure by the utility to act within such period shall entitle the applicant
to petition the commission for an order compelling interconnection on just and
reasonable terms.
I. A declaration of nonjurisdiction issued by the commission pursuant
to this Section, or deemed issued pursuant to Subsection K of this Section, shall
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1513 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 490
be binding on the commission and all parties, shall not be subject to collateral
attack, and shall survive any subsequent change in the ownership, financing,
affiliate structure, or customer identity of the private use electrical network,
provided that the private use electrical network continues to satisfy the
definition set forth in Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section and remains primarily
dedicated to serving one or more identified load customers. The commission
may revoke such declaration only upon a finding, after notice and hearing, that
the network no longer satisfies these requirements.
J. An applicant for a declaration of nonjurisdiction under this Section
may request confidential treatment of the identity of any identified load
customer prior to public announcement of the project and may request power
purchase agreement pricing and commercial terms submitted in support of the
application. The commission shall grant such requests upon a showing that
public disclosure would cause competitive harm to the applicant or its customer.
The commission shall not publicly disclose information granted confidential
treatment under this Subsection.
K. The Louisiana Public Service Commission shall adopt rules in
accordance with the provisions of this Section no later than one hundred eighty
days after the effective date of this Act, that shall include but not be limited to:
(1) An expedited process for issuance of a declaration of nonjurisdiction
for a private use electrical network.
(2) A requirement that the commission issue a determination within
thirty days of receipt of a complete application, which shall be deemed approved
if the commission fails to act within such period.
(3) Nondiscriminatory tariffs and interconnection procedures for
backup, standby, maintenance, and export service for a private use electrical
network.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1513 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 490
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.